test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aeqbtiji_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼbţiji: # Noun 187 'eng /est aitaja/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼbţiji+N+Sg+Nom: äʼbţiji
     äʼbţiji+N+Sg+Gen: äʼbţijiz
     äʼbţiji+N+Sg+Par: äʼbţijizt
     äʼbţiji+N+Sg+Dat: äʼbţijizõn
     äʼbţiji+N+Sg+Ins: äʼbţijizõks
     äʼbţiji+N+Sg+Ill: äʼbţijizõ
     äʼbţiji+N+Sg+Ela: äʼbţijizõst
     äʼbţiji+N+Pl+Nom: äʼbţijid
     äʼbţiji+N+Pl+Gen: äʼbţijid
     äʼbţiji+N+Pl+Par: äʼbţijidi
     äʼbţiji+N+Pl+Dat: äʼbţijidõn
     äʼbţiji+N+Pl+Ins: äʼbţijidõks
     äʼbţiji+N+Pl+Ill: äʼbţijiž
     äʼbţiji+N+Pl+Ela: äʼbţijisti
